District of Columbia statutes.
29-406.01

Requirement for and functions of board of directors.

(a)

A nonprofit corporation shall have a board of directors.

(b)

Except as otherwise provided in § 29-406.12, all corporate powers shall be exercised by or under the authority of the board of directors of the nonprofit corporation, and the activities and affairs of the corporation shall be managed by or under the direction, and subject to the oversight, of its board of directors.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-406.25.